Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Duluth Public School District for a grant to restore the historic pipe organ at Denfeld High School located in Duluth, Minnesota. The money must be used to support restoration of the Denfeld pipe organ, including necessary assessment, rehabilitation of the instrument, and related arts-education programming. The project must preserve and enhance access to the organ for students, community performances, and public use to preserve the arts and Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. new text end